North Carolina statutes. Chapter 132. Public Records.
§ 132-1.10.
Social security numbers and other personal identifying information.

The General Assembly finds the following:

The social security number can be used as a tool to perpetuate fraud against a person and to acquire sensitive personal, financial, medical, and familial information, the release of which could cause great financial or personal harm to an individual. While the social security number was intended to be used solely for the administration of the federal Social Security System, over time this unique numeric identifier has been used extensively for identity verification purposes and other legitimate consensual purposes.

Although there are legitimate reasons for State and local government agencies to collect social security numbers and other personal identifying information from individuals, government should collect the information only for legitimate purposes or when required by law.

When State and local government agencies possess social security numbers or other personal identifying information, the governments should minimize the instances this information is disseminated either internally within government or externally with the general public.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, no agency of the State or its political subdivisions, or any agent or employee of a government agency, shall do any of the following:

Collect a social security number from an individual unless authorized by law to do so or unless the collection of the social security number is otherwise imperative for the performance of that agency’s duties and responsibilities as prescribed by law. Social security numbers collected by an agency must be relevant to the purpose for which collected and shall not be collected until and unless the need for social security numbers has been clearly documented.

Fail, when collecting a social security number from an individual, to segregate that number on a separate page from the rest of the record, or as otherwise appropriate, in order that the social security number can be more easily redacted pursuant to a valid public records request.

Fail, when collecting a social security number from an individual, to provide, at the time of or prior to the actual collection of the social security number by that agency, that individual, upon request, with a statement of the purpose or purposes for which the social security number is being collected and used.

Use the social security number for any purpose other than the purpose stated.

Intentionally communicate or otherwise make available to the general public a person’s social security number or other identifying information. “Identifying information”, as used in this subdivision, shall have the same meaning as in G.S. 14-113.20(b), except it shall not include electronic identification numbers, electronic mail names or addresses, Internet account numbers, Internet identification names, parent’s legal surname prior to marriage, or drivers license numbers appearing on law enforcement records. Identifying information shall be confidential and not be a public record under this Chapter. A record, with identifying information removed or redacted, is a public record if it would otherwise be a public record under this Chapter but for the identifying information. The presence of identifying information in a public record does not change the nature of the public record. If all other public records requirements are met under this Chapter, the agency of the State or its political subdivisions shall respond to a public records request, even if the records contain identifying information, as promptly as possible, by providing the public record with the identifying information removed or redacted.

Intentionally print or imbed an individual’s social security number on any card required for the individual to access government services.

Require an individual to transmit the individual’s social security number over the Internet, unless the connection is secure or the social security number is encrypted.

Require an individual to use the individual’s social security number to access an Internet Web site, unless a password or unique personal identification number or other authentication device is also required to access the Internet Web site.

Print an individual’s social security number on any materials that are mailed to the individual, unless state or federal law required that the social security number be on the document to be mailed. A social security number that is permitted to be mailed under this subdivision may not be printed, in whole or in part, on a postcard or other mailer not requiring an envelope, or visible on the envelope or without the envelope having been opened.

Subsection (b) of this section does not apply in the following circumstances:

To social security numbers or other identifying information disclosed to another governmental entity or its agents, employees, or contractors if disclosure is necessary for the receiving entity to perform its duties and responsibilities. The receiving governmental entity and its agents, employees, and contractors shall maintain the confidential and exempt status of such numbers.

To social security numbers or other identifying information disclosed pursuant to a court order, warrant, or subpoena.

To social security numbers or other identifying information disclosed for public health purposes pursuant to and in compliance with Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

To social security numbers or other identifying information that have been redacted.

To certified copies of vital records issued by the State Registrar and other authorized officials pursuant to G.S. 130A-93(c). The State Registrar may disclose any identifying information other than social security numbers on any uncertified vital record.

To any recorded document in the official records of the register of deeds of the county.

To any document filed in the official records of the courts.

(c1)

If an agency of the State or its political subdivisions, or any agent or employee of a government agency, experiences a security breach, as defined in Article 2A of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, the agency shall comply with the requirements of

G.S. 75-65

.

No person preparing or filing a document to be recorded or filed in the official records of the register of deeds, the Department of the Secretary of State, or of the courts may include any person’s social security, employer taxpayer identification, drivers license, state identification, passport, checking account, savings account, credit card, or debit card number, or personal identification (PIN) code or passwords in that document, unless otherwise expressly required by law or court order, adopted by the State Registrar on records of vital events, or redacted. Any loan closing instruction that requires the inclusion of a person’s social security number on a document to be recorded shall be void. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each violation.

The validity of an instrument as between the parties to the instrument is not affected by the inclusion of personal information on a document recorded or filed with the official records of the register of deeds or the Department of the Secretary of State. The register of deeds or the Department of the Secretary of State may not reject an instrument presented for recording because the instrument contains an individual’s personal information.

Any person has the right to request that a register of deeds or clerk of court remove, from an image or copy of an official record placed on a register of deeds’ or court’s Internet Website available to the general public or an Internet Web site available to the general public used by a register of deeds or court to display public records by the register of deeds or clerk of court, the person’s social security, employer taxpayer identification, drivers license, state identification, passport, checking account, savings account, credit card, or debit card number, or personal identification (PIN) code or passwords contained in that official record. The request must be made in writing, legibly signed by the requester, and delivered by mail, facsimile, or electronic transmission, or delivered in person to the register of deeds or clerk of court. The request must specify the personal information to be redacted, information that identifies the document that contains the personal information and unique information that identifies the location within the document that contains the social security, employer taxpayer identification, drivers license, state identification, passport, checking account, savings account, credit card, or debit card number, or personal identification (PIN) code or passwords to be redacted. The request for redaction shall be considered a public record with access restricted to the register of deeds, the clerk of court, their staff, or upon order of the court. The register of deeds or clerk of court shall have no duty to inquire beyond the written request to verify the identity of a person requesting redaction and shall have no duty to remove redaction for any reason upon subsequent request by an individual or by order of the court, if impossible to do so. No fee will be charged for the redaction pursuant to such request. Any person who requests a redaction without proper authority to do so shall be guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each violation.

(f1)

Without a request made pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, a register of deeds, clerk of court, or the Administrative Office of the Courts may remove from images or copies of publicly accessible official records any of the identifying and financial information listed in subsection (f) of this section that is contained in that official record. Registers of deeds, clerks of court, and the Administrative Office of the Courts may apply optical character recognition technology or other reasonably available technology to publicly accessible official records in order to, in good faith, identify and redact any of the identifying and financial information listed in subsection (f) of this section. Notwithstanding the foregoing, law enforcement personnel, judicial officials, and parties to a case and their counsel shall be entitled to access, inspect, and copy unredacted records.

(f2)

The Administrative Office of the Courts or a clerk of superior court may keep confidential the names, phone numbers, and e-mail addresses collected for the purpose of a court proceeding notification system.

A register of deeds or clerk of court shall immediately and conspicuously post signs throughout his or her offices for public viewing and shall immediately and conspicuously post a notice on any Internet Web site available to the general public used by a register of deeds or clerk of court a notice stating, in substantially similar form, the following:

Any person preparing or filing a document for recordation or filing in the official records may not include a social security, employer taxpayer identification, drivers license, state identification, passport, checking account, savings account, credit card, or debit card number, or personal identification (PIN) code or passwords in the document, unless expressly required by law or court order, adopted by the State Registrar on records of vital events, or redacted so that no more than the last four digits of the identification number is included.

Any person has a right to request a register of deeds or clerk of court to remove, from an image or copy of an official record placed on a register of deeds’ or clerk of court’s Internet Web site available to the general public or on an Internet Web site available to the general public used by a register of deeds or clerk of court to display public records, any social security, employer taxpayer identification, drivers license, state identification, passport, checking account, savings account, credit card, or debit card number, or personal identification (PIN) code or passwords contained in an official record. The request must be made in writing and delivered by mail, facsimile, or electronic transmission, or delivered in person, to the register of deeds or clerk of court. The request must specify the personal information to be redacted, information that identifies the document that contains the personal information and unique information that identifies the location within the document that contains the social security, employer taxpayer identification, drivers license, state identification, passport, checking account, savings account, credit card, or debit card number, or personal identification (PIN) code or passwords to be redacted. No fee will be charged for the redaction pursuant to such a request. Any person who requests a redaction without proper authority to do so shall be guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each violation.

Any affected person may petition the court for an order directing compliance with this section. No liability shall accrue to a register of deeds or clerk of court or to his or her agent for any action related to provisions of this section or for any claims or damages that might result from a social security number or other identifying information on the public record or on a register of deeds’ or clerk of court’s Internet website available to the general public or an Internet Web site available to the general public used by a register of deeds or clerk of court.

History.

2005-414, s. 4; 2006-173, ss. 1-7; 2009-355, s. 3; 2017-158, s. 26.3; 2018-40, s. 13.1.

§ 132-1.11.
Economic development incentives.

Assumptions and Methodologies. — Subject to the provisions of this Chapter regarding confidential information and the withholding of public records relating to the proposed expansion or location of specific business or industrial projects when the release of those records would frustrate the purpose for which they were created, whenever a public agency or its subdivision performs a cost-benefit analysis or similar assessment with respect to economic development incentives offered to a specific business or industrial project, the agency or its subdivision must describe in detail the assumptions and methodologies used in completing the analysis or assessment. This description is a public record and is subject to all provisions of this Chapter and other law regarding public records.

Disclosure of Public Records Requirements. — Whenever an agency or its subdivision first proposes, negotiates, or accepts an application for economic development incentives with respect to a specific industrial or business project, the agency or subdivision must disclose that any information obtained by the agency or subdivision is subject to laws regarding disclosure of public records. In addition, the agency or subdivision must fully and accurately describe the instances in which confidential information may be withheld from disclosure, the types of information that qualify as confidential information, and the methods for ensuring that confidential information is not disclosed.

History.

2005-429, s. 1.2.

§ 132-1.11A.
Limited access to identifying information of minors participating in local government programs and programs funded by the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or a local partnership in certain localities.

A public record, as defined by

G.S. 132-1

, does not include, as to any minor participating in a program sponsored by a local government or combination of local governments, a program funded by the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., under G.S. 143B-168.12, or a program funded by a local partnership under G.S. 143B-168.14, any of the following information as to that minor participant: (i) name, (ii) address, (iii) age, (iv) date of birth, (v) telephone number, (vi) the name or address of that minor participant’s parent or legal guardian, (vii) e-mail address, or (viii) any other identifying information on an application to participate in such program or other records related to that program. Notwithstanding this subsection, the name of a minor who has received a scholarship or other local government-funded award of a financial nature from a local government is a public record.

The county, municipality, and zip code of residence of each participating minor covered by subsection (a) of this section is a public record, with the information listed in subsection (a) of this section redacted.

Nothing in this section makes the information listed in subsection (a) of this section confidential information.

This section applies to the County of Chatham, the Towns of Apex, Cary, Fuquay-Varina, Garner, Holly Springs, Knightdale, Morrisville, Rolesville, Wake Forest, Wendell, and Zebulon, and the City of Raleigh only.

History.

2008-126, s. 1; 2012-67, s. 1; 2012-139, s. 1(a), (b); 2012-194, s. 70.5(a), (c).

§ 132-1.12.
Limited access to identifying information of minors participating in local government parks and recreation programs and programs funded by the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or a local partnership in other localities.

A public record, as defined by

G.S. 132-1

, does not include, as to any minor participating in a park or recreation program sponsored by a local government or combination of local governments, a program funded by the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., under G.S. 143B-168.12, or a program funded by a local partnership under G.S. 143B-168.14, any of the following information as to that minor participant: (i) name, (ii) address, (iii) age, (iv) date of birth, (v) telephone number, (vi) the name or address of that minor participant’s parent or legal guardian, or (vii) any other identifying information on an application to participate in such program or other records related to that program.

The county, municipality, and zip code of residence of each participating minor covered by subsection (a) of this section is a public record, with the information listed in subsection (a) of this section redacted.

Nothing in this section makes the information listed in subsection (a) of this section confidential information.

History.

2008-126, s. 1; 2012-67, s. 1.

§ 132-1.13.
Electronic lists of subscribers open for inspection but not available for copying.

Notwithstanding this chapter, when a unit of local government maintains an electronic mail list of individual subscribers, this chapter does not require that unit of local government to provide a copy of the list. The list shall be available for public inspection in either printed or electronic format or both as the unit of local government elects.

If a unit of local government maintains an electronic mail list of individual subscribers, the unit of local government and its employees and officers may use that list only: (i) for the purpose for which it was subscribed to; (ii) to notify subscribers of an emergency to the public health or public safety; or (iii) in case of deletion of that list, to notify subscribers of the existence of any similar lists to subscribe to.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-54, s. 1, effective April 28, 2011.

History.

2010-83, ss. 1-3; 2011-54, s. 1.

§ 132-1.14.
Personally identifiable information of public utility customers.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a public record, as defined by

G.S. 132-1

, does not include personally identifiable information obtained by the Public Staff of the Utilities Commission from customers requesting assistance from the Public Staff regarding rate or service disputes with a public utility, as defined by G.S. 62-3(23).

The Public Staff may disclose personally identifiable information of a customer to the public utility involved in the matter for the purpose of investigating such disputes.

Such personally identifiable information is a public record to the extent disclosed by the customer in a complaint filed with the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 62-73

.

For purposes of this section, “personally identifiable information” means the customer’s name, physical address, e-mail address, telephone number, and public utility account number.

History.

2017-10, s. 2.1(c).

§§ 132-1.15 through 132-1.22.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 132-1.23.
Eugenics program records.

Records in the custody of the State, including those in the custody of the Office of Justice for Sterilization Victims, concerning the Eugenics Board of North Carolina’s program are confidential and are not public records, including the records identifying (i) individuals impacted by the program, (ii) individuals, or their guardians or authorized agents, inquiring about the impact of the program on the individuals, or (iii) individuals, or their guardians or authorized agents, inquiring about the potential impact of the program on others.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an individual impacted by the program, or a guardian or authorized agent of that individual, may obtain that individual’s records under the program upon execution of a proper release authorization.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, minutes or reports of the Eugenics Board of North Carolina, for which identifying information of the individuals impacted by the program have been redacted, may be released to any person. As used in this subsection, “identifying information” shall include the name, street address, birth day and month, and any other information the State believes may lead to the identity of any individual impacted by the program, or of any relative of an individual impacted by the program.

History.

2011-188, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 6.18(c); 2014-100, s. 6.13(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.18(c), effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

§ 132-2.
Custodian designated.

The public official in charge of an office having public records shall be the custodian thereof.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 2.

§ 132-3.
Destruction of records regulated.

Prohibition. — No public official may destroy, sell, loan, or otherwise dispose of any public record, except in accordance with

G.S. 121-5

and

G.S. 130A-99

, without the consent of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. Whoever unlawfully removes a public record from the office where it is usually kept, or alters, defaces, mutilates or destroys it shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and upon conviction only fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

Revenue Records. — Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and

G.S. 121-5

, when a record of the Department of Revenue has been copied in any manner, the original record may be destroyed upon the order of the Secretary of Revenue. If a record of the Department of Revenue has not been copied, the original record shall be preserved for at least three years. After three years the original record may be destroyed upon the order of the Secretary of Revenue.

Employment Security Records. — Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and

G.S. 121-5

, when a record of the Division of Employment Security has been copied in any manner, the original record may be destroyed upon the order of the Division. If a record of that Division has not been copied, the original record shall be preserved for at least three years. After three years the original record may be destroyed upon the order of the Assistant Secretary of Commerce.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 3; 1943, c. 237; 1953, c. 675, s. 17; 1957, c. 330, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1993, c. 485, s. 39; c. 539, s. 966; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-309, s. 12; 2001-115, s. 2; 2011-401, s. 3.16; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Cross References.

For section further regulating destruction of records, see

G.S. 121-5

.

§ 132-4.
Disposition of records at end of official’s term.

Whoever has the custody of any public records shall, at the expiration of his term of office, deliver to his successor, or, if there be none, to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, all records, books, writings, letters and documents kept or received by him in the transaction of his official business; and any such person who shall refuse or neglect for the space of 10 days after request made in writing by any citizen of the State to deliver as herein required such public records to the person authorized to receive them shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 4; 1943, c. 237; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 1975, c. 696, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 967; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 132-5.
Demanding custody.

Whoever is entitled to the custody of public records shall demand them from any person having illegal possession of them, who shall forthwith deliver the same to him. If the person who unlawfully possesses public records shall without just cause refuse or neglect for 10 days after a request made in writing by any citizen of the State to deliver such records to their lawful custodian, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 5; 1975, c. 696, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 968; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “You Can’t Always Get What You Want: A Look at North Carolina’s Public Records Law,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1527 (1994).

§ 132-5.1.
Regaining custody; civil remedies.

The Secretary of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or his designated representative or any public official who is the custodian of public records which are in the possession of a person or agency not authorized by the custodian or by law to possess such public records may petition the superior court in the county in which the person holding such records resides or in which the materials in issue, or any part thereof, are located for the return of such public records. The court may order such public records to be delivered to the petitioner upon finding that the materials in issue are public records and that such public records are in the possession of a person not authorized by the custodian of the public records or by law to possess such public records. If the order of delivery does not receive compliance, the petitioner may request that the court enforce such order through its contempt power and procedures.

At any time after the filing of the petition set out in subsection (a) or contemporaneous with such filing, the public official seeking the return of the public records may by ex parte petition request the judge or the court in which the action was filed to grant one of the following provisional remedies:

An order directed at the sheriff commanding him to seize the materials which are the subject of the action and deliver the same to the court under the circumstances hereinafter set forth; or

A preliminary injunction preventing the sale, removal, disposal or destruction of or damage to such public records pending a final judgment by the court.

The judge or court aforesaid shall issue an order of seizure or grant a preliminary injunction upon receipt of an affidavit from the petitioner which alleges that the materials at issue are public records and that unless one of said provisional remedies is granted, there is a danger that such materials shall be sold, secreted, removed out of the State or otherwise disposed of so as not to be forthcoming to answer the final judgment of the court respecting the same; or that such property may be destroyed or materially damaged or injured if not seized or if injunctive relief is not granted.

The aforementioned order of seizure or preliminary injunction shall issue without notice to the respondent and without the posting of any bond or other security by the petitioner.

History.

1975, c. 787, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 14.30(x).

§ 132-6.
Inspection, examination and copies of public records.

Every custodian of public records shall permit any record in the custodian’s custody to be inspected and examined at reasonable times and under reasonable supervision by any person, and shall, as promptly as possible, furnish copies thereof upon payment of any fees as may be prescribed by law. As used herein, “custodian” does not mean an agency that holds the public records of other agencies solely for purposes of storage or safekeeping or solely to provide data processing.

(a1)

A public agency or custodian may satisfy the requirements in subsection (a) of this section by making public records available online in a format that allows a person to view the public record and print or save the public record to obtain a copy. If the public agency or custodian maintains public records online in a format that allows a person to view and print or save the public records to obtain a copy, the public agency or custodian is not required to provide copies to these public records in any other way.

No person requesting to inspect and examine public records, or to obtain copies thereof, shall be required to disclose the purpose or motive for the request.

No request to inspect, examine, or obtain copies of public records shall be denied on the grounds that confidential information is commingled with the requested nonconfidential information. If it is necessary to separate confidential from nonconfidential information in order to permit the inspection, examination, or copying of the public records, the public agency shall bear the cost of such separation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, public records relating to the proposed expansion or location of specific business or industrial projects may be withheld so long as their inspection, examination or copying would frustrate the purpose for which such public records were created; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to permit the withholding of public records relating to general economic development policies or activities. Once the State, a local government, or the specific business has announced a commitment by the business to expand or locate a specific project in this State or the business has made a final decision not to do so, of which the State or local government agency involved with the project knows or should know, the provisions of this subsection allowing public records to be withheld by the agency no longer apply. Once the provisions of this subsection no longer apply, the agency shall disclose as soon as practicable, and within 25 business days, public records requested for the announced project that are not otherwise made confidential by law. An announcement that a business or industrial project has committed to expand or locate in the State shall not require disclosure of local government records relating to the project if the business has not selected a specific location within the State for the project. Once a specific location for the project has been determined, local government records must be disclosed, upon request, in accordance with the provisions of this section. For purposes of this section, “local government records” include records maintained by the State that relate to a local government’s efforts to attract the project.Records relating to the proposed expansion or location of specific business or industrial projects that are in the custody of the Department of Commerce or an entity with which the Department contracts pursuant to G.S. 143B-431.01 shall be treated as follows:

Unless controlled by another subdivision of this subsection, the records may be withheld if their inspection, examination, or copying would frustrate the purpose for which the records were created.

If no discretionary incentives pursuant to Chapter 143B of the General Statutes are requested for a project and if the specific business decides to expand or locate the project in the State, then the records relating to the project shall not be disclosed.

If the specific business has requested discretionary incentives for a project pursuant to Chapter 143B of the General Statutes and if either the business decides not to expand or locate the project in the State or the project does not receive the discretionary incentives, then the only records relating to the project that may be disclosed are the requests for discretionary incentives pursuant to Chapter 143B of the General Statutes and any information submitted to the Department by the contracted entity.

If the specific business receives a discretionary incentive for a project pursuant to Chapter 143B of the General Statutes and the State or the specific business announces a commitment to expand or locate the project in this State, all records requested for the announced project, not otherwise made confidential by law, shall be disclosed as soon as practicable and within 25 days from the date of announcement.

The application of this Chapter is subject to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 121 of the General Statutes, the North Carolina Archives and History Act.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (a1) of this section, the inspection or copying of any public record which, because of its age or condition could be damaged during inspection or copying, may be made subject to reasonable restrictions intended to preserve the particular record.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 6; 1987, c. 835, s. 1; 1995, c. 388, s. 2; 2005-429, s. 1.1; 2014-18, s. 1.1(c); 2014-115, s. 56.1; 2017-10, s. 2.9(b).

Local Modification.

Durham: 1993, c. 227, s. 9; New Hanover: 1981, c. 960; Orange: 1993, c. 358, s. 14; 1995, c. 339, s. 2; city of Asheville: 1999, c. 206, s. 9; city of Durham: 1993, c. 227, s. 9; city of Gastonia: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 902, s. 8; 1991, c. 557, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-429, s. 1.1, effective September 22, 2005, in subsection (d), deleted “in the State” following “industrial projects” and added the last five sentences.

Session Laws 2014-18, s. 1.1(c), effective July 1, 2014, in the second sentence of subsection (d), substituted “and that the business will receive a discretionary incentive for the project pursuant to Chapter 143B of the General Statutes” for “or a final decision not to do so and the business has communicated that commitment or decision to the State or local government agency involved with the project”; and added the third and fourth sentences.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 56.1, effective August 11, 2014, in subsection (d), substituted “or the business has made a final decision not to do so, of which the State or local government agency involved with the project knows or should know” for “and that the business will receive a discretionary incentive for the project pursuant to Chapter 143B of the General Statutes” in the second sentence; deleted the third and fourth sentences, which pertained to discretionary incentives for business projects; and added the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2017-10, s. 2.9(b), effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present section heading for the former, which read: “Inspection and examination of records.”; added subsection (a1); in subsection (c), substituted “cost of such separation” for “cost of such separation on the following schedule,” and deleted “State agencies after June 30, 1996; Municipalities with populations of 10,000 or more, counties with populations of 25,000 or more, as determined by the 1990 U.S. Census, and public hospitals in those counties, after June 30, 1997; Municipalities with populations of less than 10,000, counties with populations of less than 25,000, as determined by the 1990 U.S. Census, and public hospitals in those counties, after June 30, 1998; Political subdivisions and their agencies that are not otherwise covered by this schedule, after June 30, 1998”; and substituted “subsections (a) and (a1)” for “subsection (a)” in subsection (f).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on public access to government-held records, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1187 (1977).

For note on the public’s access to public records, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 853 (1982).

For comment, “You Can’t Always Get What You Want: A Look at North Carolina’s Public Records Law,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1527 (1994).

For article, “Outlawed and Exiled: Zero Tolerance and Second Generation Race Discrimination in Public Schools,” see 29 N.C. Cent. L. J. 147 (2007).

For article, “Fired by Liars: Due Process Implications in the Recent Changes to North Carolina’s Public Disclosure Laws,” see 89 N.C.L. Rev. 2228 (2011).